Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 2
BUILDING CODES

30-28-201. Commissioners may adopt - emission performance standards required - reporting.

A board of county commissioners is authorized to adopt ordinances and a building code consistent with the uniform building code, 1988 edition, as promulgated by the international conference of building officials and as revised from time to time, in all or part of the county, and not embraced within the limits of any incorporated city or town. Buildings or structures used for the sole purpose of providing shelter for agricultural implements, farm products, livestock, or poultry may be excepted. The requirements shall be uniform for each class of dwelling, building, or structure. The board of county commissioners may employ qualified technical experts to assist in the preparation of the text of such ordinances and the area building code.

By the date established in section 25-7-407, C.R.S., every board of county commissioners of a county which has enacted a building code, and thereafter every board of county commissioners of a county which enacts a building code, shall enact a building code provision to regulate the construction and installation of fireplaces in order to minimize emission levels. Such building code provision shall contain standards which shall be the same as or stricter than the approved emission performance standards for fireplaces established by the air quality control commission in the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 25-7-407, C.R.S.

Every board of county commissioners, when adopting or updating any building code, shall adopt and enforce a building energy code that meets or exceeds the standards in one of the three most recent versions of the international energy conservation code pursuant to section 30-28-211.

By January 1, 2020, every board of county commissioners of a county which has enacted a building code and an energy code shall report the current version of their county's building and energy codes to the Colorado energy office. Thereafter, every board of county commissioners is encouraged to report any change in their county's building and energy code to the Colorado energy office within a month of changing their county's building and energy codes.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 242, § 1.

L. 47:

p. 364, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45B, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 36-15-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-15-1.

L. 73:

p. 472, § 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 782, § 2, effective April 12.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 1144, § 8, effective June 16.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 1450, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 2801, § 562, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2) amended, p. 773, § 56, effective June 1.

L. 2007:

(3) added, p. 695, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(3) amended and (4) added, (HB 19-1260), ch. 357, p. 3284, § 1, effective August 2.

30-28-202. Designation of zoned area - hearing.

The county planning commission of any county, upon request from the board of county commissioners of the county, may designate part or all of the county for the adoption of a building code. The county planning commission shall certify a copy of the building code to the board of county commissioners of the county. After receiving the certification of said building code from the county planning commission and before the adoption of any building code, the board of county commissioners shall hold a public hearing on the proposed text. The time and place of the hearing shall be designated in a notice to be given by publication once weekly for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. Such notice shall state the place at which the text of the proposed building code may be inspected and the description of the areas to be covered by the code. No substantial change in or departure from the proposed text so certified by the county planning commission shall be made unless such change or departure is first submitted to the certifying county planning commission for its approval, disapproval, or suggestions.

The county planning commission shall have thirty days from such submission within which to send its report to the board of county commissioners. The opinion of the county planning commission shall be advisory only, and, upon receipt thereof, the board of county commissioners may accept, reject, or amend the proposed change or departure. After a public hearing has been held thereon, the board of county commissioners, by resolution, may adopt a building code for all or part of the county.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 365, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45B, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 36-15-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-15-2.

L. 73:

p. 472, § 2.

Cross references:

For clarification of terms and requirements for notice by publication, see part 1 of article 70 of title 24.

30-28-203. Purpose of codes.

The provisions of any building code shall be made with a reasonable consideration of, and in accordance with, the public health, safety, morals, and general welfare and the safety, protection, and sanitation of such dwellings, buildings, and structures.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 244, § 3.

L. 47:

p. 365, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45B, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 36-15-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-15-3.

L. 73:

p. 473, § 3.

30-28-204. Amendment of building code.

The board of county commissioners from time to time by resolution may alter and amend any county building code after public hearing, notice of which hearing shall be given by at least one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least fourteen days prior to said hearing. In no case shall the area covered by the building code be extended or changed unless the same has been proposed by or is first submitted for the approval, disapproval, or suggestions of the county planning commission. Unless the county planning commission acts within thirty days, approval shall be assumed. The opinion of the county planning commission shall be advisory only and not binding upon the board of county commissioners.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 244, § 4.

L. 47:

p. 366, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45B, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 36-15-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-15-4.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 966, § 8, effective June 1.

30-28-205. County building inspector - permit required - appeal.

The county building inspector, as authorized in section 30-28-114, may be authorized by the board of county commissioners to administer and enforce the building code adopted pursuant to this part 2; and the board of county commissioners shall fix a reasonable schedule of fees for the issuance of building permits by the county building inspector. After the adoption of the building code, it shall be unlawful to erect, construct, reconstruct, alter, or remodel any structure, dwelling, or building in the designated area, except buildings or structures used for the sole purpose of providing shelter for agricultural implements, farm products, livestock, or poultry without first obtaining a building permit from the county building inspector. The county building inspector shall not issue any permit unless the plans for the proposed erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, or remodeling fully conform to the regulations and restrictions in the building code.

No permit fee provided for pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be charged unless an inspection is actually made by such inspector who is fully qualified to perform the required type of inspection.

The county building inspector shall not issue any permit unless the plans and specifications for such proposed erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, or remodeling conform to the regulations and restrictions in said building code. All such proposed erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, or remodeling shall bear the seal of an architect or engineer licensed by the state of Colorado, unless the preparation of plans and specification is exempted by section 12-120-403. Such plans and specifications prepared by architectural or engineering subdisciplines shall be so designated and shall bear the seal and signature of the architect or engineer for that subdiscipline.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 244, § 5.

L. 47:

p. 366, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45B, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 36-15-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-15-5.

L. 73:

p. 473, § 4.

L. 86:

(3) added, p. 610, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 235, § 3, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 762, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1719, § 215, effective October 1.

30-28-206. Board of review - qualifications - powers.

The board of county commissioners of any county which enacts a building code under the authority of this part 2 may provide for a board of review of three or five members and for the manner of appointment of such members. Members of the board shall be experienced in building construction. The board of county commissioners may fix per diem compensation and terms for the members of such boards of review, which terms shall be of such length and so arranged that the terms of at least one member will expire each year. Any member of the board of review may be removed for cause by the board of county commissioners upon written charges and after a public hearing. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as in the case of original appointments. The board of county commissioners shall provide and specify in its building code or other resolution general rules to govern the organization, procedure, and jurisdiction of said board of review, which rules shall not be inconsistent with the provisions of this part 2, and the board of review may adopt supplemental rules of procedure not inconsistent with this part 2 or such general rules.

Any building code adopted by the board of county commissioners may provide that the board of review, in appropriate cases and subject to appropriate principles, standards, rules, conditions, and safeguards set forth in the building code, may make special exceptions to the terms of the building code in harmony with their general purpose and intent. The board of county commissioners also may authorize the board of review to formulate suggested amendments to the building code for the consideration of the board of county commissioners. In addition, the board of review may adopt substantive rules and regulations based on the provisions of the building code adopted by the board of county commissioners. In no case, however, shall these rules become effective unless a public hearing thereon has been conducted by the board of review. Notice of the hearing, stating its time and place and where the text of the proposed substantive rules and regulations may be inspected, shall be given in the same manner as provided in the initial adoption of the code.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 244, § 6.

L. 47:

p. 366, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45B, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 36-15-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-15-6.

30-28-207. Board of review - meetings - appeals.

Meetings of the board of review shall be held at the call of the chairman and at such other times as the board in its rules of procedure may specify. The chairman or, in his absence, the acting chairman may administer oaths and compel the attendance of witnesses. All meetings of the board of review shall be open to the public. The board shall keep minutes of its proceedings showing the vote of each member upon each question or, if absent or failing to vote, indicating such fact, and it shall keep records of its examinations and other official actions, all of which shall be immediately filed in the office of the board and shall be a public record.

Appeals to the board of review may be taken by any person aggrieved by his inability to obtain a building permit or by any officer, department, board, or bureau of the county affected by the grant or refusal of a building permit. Any person, officer, department, board, or bureau may appeal to the board of review from the decision of any administrative officer or agency based upon or made in the course of the administration or enforcement of the provisions of the building code. The time within which such appeal shall be made, and the form or other procedure relating thereto, shall be as specified in the general rules provided by the board of county commissioners to govern the procedure of such board of review or in the supplemental rules of procedure adopted by such board.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 244, § 6.

L. 47:

p. 366, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45B, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 36-15-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-15-7.

30-28-208. Copies of code available - evidence.

Upon the adoption of such area building code, the board of county commissioners shall file certified copies thereof in its office, which copies shall be accessible to the public at a cost not to exceed that of printing the same. The board of county commissioners shall also file a notice with the county clerk and recorder setting forth a description of the area subject to the building code. Copies of the code printed by authority of the board of county commissioners shall be prima facie evidence of the original text in all courts and tribunals of this state.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 244, § 6.

L. 47:

p. 368, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45B, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 36-15-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-15-8.

30-28-209. Violation - injunction and other remedies.

It is unlawful to erect, construct, reconstruct, or alter any building or structure in a manner that results in a violation of any regulation in, or of any provisions of, the area building code, or any amendment thereof, enacted or adopted by the board of county commissioners under the authority of this part 2. Any person, firm, or corporation violating any such regulation, provision, or amendment thereof, or any provision of this part 2, commits a civil infraction. Each day during which such illegal erection, construction, reconstruction, or alteration continues shall be deemed a separate offense.

It is unlawful to use any building or structure in violation of any regulation in, or of any provision of, the area building code, or any amendment thereto, enacted or adopted by any board of county commissioners under the authority of this part 2. Any person, firm, or corporation violating any such regulation, provision, or amendment thereof commits a civil infraction. Each day during which such illegal use of any building or structure continues shall be deemed a separate offense. Nothing in this subsection (1)(b)(I) prohibits the use of any building or structure in violation of an otherwise applicable building code where the use complies with any building code that was in effect at the time the building or structure was erected, constructed, reconstructed, or altered.

Whenever a county building inspector authorized pursuant to sections 30-28-114 and 30-28-205, or any inspector employed by an intergovernmental entity created in accordance with the requirements of part 2 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., who exercises the functions of a county building inspector, has personal knowledge of any violation of the requirements of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), he or she shall give written notice to the violator to correct the violation within ten days after the date of the notice. Where the violator fails to correct the violation within the ten-day period, the county building inspector may request that the sheriff of the county issue a summons and complaint to the violator, stating the nature of the violation with sufficient particularity to give notice of the charge to the violator. The summons and complaint shall require that the violator appear in county court at a definite time and place stated therein to answer and defend the charge.

One copy of the summons and complaint shall be served upon the violator by the sheriff of the county in the manner provided by law for the service of a criminal summons. One copy each shall be retained by the sheriff and the county building inspector, and one copy shall be transmitted by the sheriff to the clerk of the county court.

It is the responsibility of the county attorney to enforce the provisions of this subsection (1). Where there is no county attorney or in the event that the board of county commissioners deems it appropriate, the board may appoint the district attorney of the judicial district in which the building or structure is located to perform such enforcement duties in lieu of the county attorney.

In case any building or structure is, or is proposed to be, erected, constructed, reconstructed, altered, or used in violation of any regulation or provision of the area building code, or amendment thereto, enacted or adopted by any board of county commissioners under the authority granted by this part 2, the county attorney of the county in which such building, structure, or land is situated, in addition to other remedies provided by law, may institute an injunction, mandamus, abatement, or other appropriate action or proceeding to prevent, enjoin, abate, or remove such unlawful erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, or use. Where there is no county attorney or in the event that the board deems it appropriate, the board may appoint the district attorney of the judicial district in which the building or structure is located to perform such enforcement duties in lieu of the county attorney.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 245, § 7.

L. 47:

p. 368, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45B, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 36-15-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-15-9.

L. 2003:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1836, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(b)(II) amended, p. 235, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) and (1)(b)(I) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3250, § 510, effective March 1, 2022.

30-28-210. County court actions for civil penalties for building violations.

It is unlawful to erect, construct, reconstruct, alter, maintain, or use any building, structure, or land in violation of this part 2 or any provisions of the area building code. In addition to any penalties imposed pursuant to section 30-28-209, any person, firm, or corporation violating any provision of this part 2 or any provision of the area building code may be subject to the imposition, by order of the county court, of a civil penalty in an amount of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars. It is within the discretion of the county attorney to determine whether to pursue the civil penalties set forth in this section, the remedies set forth in section 30-28-209, or both. Each day after the issuance of the order of the county court during which such unlawful activity continues shall be deemed a separate violation and shall in accordance with the subsequent provisions of this section, be the subject of a continuing penalty in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars for each such day. Until paid, any civil penalty ordered by the county court and assessed under this subsection (1) shall, as of recording, be a lien against the property on which the violation has been found to exist. In case the assessment is not paid within thirty days, it may be certified by the county attorney to the county treasurer, who shall collect the assessment, together with a ten percent penalty for the cost of collection, in the same manner as other taxes are collected. The laws of this state for assessment and collection of general taxes, including the laws for the sale and redemption of property for taxes, shall apply to the collection of assessments pursuant to this subsection (1). Any lien placed against the property pursuant to this subsection (1) shall be recorded with the clerk and recorder of the county in which the property is located.

In the event any building or structure is erected, constructed, reconstructed, altered, maintained, or used in violation of this part 2 or of any provision of the area building code, the county attorney of the county in which such building or structure is situated, in addition to other remedies provided by law, may commence a civil action in county court for the county in which such building or structure is situated seeking the imposition of a civil penalty in accordance with the provisions of this section.

A building inspector designated by resolution of the board of county commissioners shall, upon personal information and belief that a violation of this part 2 or of any provision of the area building code has occurred, give written notice to the violator to correct the violation within ten days after the date of the notice. If the violator fails to correct the violation within the ten-day period or within any extension period granted by the building inspector, the building inspector, the sheriff of the county, or the county attorney may issue a summons and complaint to the violator stating the nature of the violation with sufficient particularity to give notice of the charge to the violator.

One copy of the summons and complaint issued pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) shall be served upon the violator in the manner provided by law for the service of a county court civil summons and complaint in accordance with the Colorado rules of county court civil procedure. The summons and complaint shall also be filed with the clerk of the county court and thereafter the action shall proceed in accordance with the Colorado rules of county court civil procedure.

If the county court finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that a violation of this part 2 or of any provision of the area building code has occurred, the court shall order the violator to pay a civil penalty in an amount allowed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The penalty shall be payable immediately by the violator to the county treasurer. In the event that the alleged violation has been cured or otherwise removed and the violator has notified the building inspector of the cure or removal at least five business days prior to the appearance date in the summons, then the county attorney shall so inform the court and request that the action be dismissed without fine or appearance of the defendant.

Upon the filing with the court of a receipt issued by the county treasurer showing payment in full of a civil penalty assessed pursuant to this section and upon the filing of an affidavit of the county building inspector that the violation has been cured, removed, or corrected, the court shall dismiss the action and issue a satisfaction in full of the judgment so entered. The court may also dismiss the action upon a motion of the county attorney indicating that the matter has been otherwise resolved.

If a receipt showing full payment of the civil penalty or the affidavit or the motion by the county attorney required by subsection (3) of this section is not filed, the action shall continue and the court shall retain jurisdiction to impose an additional penalty against the violator in the amount specified in subsection (1) of this section. The additional penalty shall be imposed by the court upon motion filed by the county and proof that the violation has not been cured, removed, or corrected. Thereafter, the action shall continue until the filing with the court of a receipt issued by the county treasurer showing payment in full of the civil penalty and any additional penalties so assessed and the filing of an affidavit of the county building inspector that the violation has been cured, removed, or corrected, or until a motion by the county attorney to dismiss the action is granted by the court.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 340, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1), (2)(b), (2)(d), (3), and (4) amended, p. 235, § 5, effective July 1.

30-28-211. Energy efficient building codes - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that there is statewide interest in requiring an effective energy efficient building code for the following reasons:

Excessive energy consumption creates effects beyond the boundaries of the local government within which the energy is consumed because the production of power occurs in centralized locations.

Air pollutant emissions from energy consumption affect the health of the citizens throughout Colorado.

The strain on the grid from peak electric power demands is not confined to jurisdictional boundaries.

There is statewide interest in the reliability of the electrical grid and an adequate supply of heating oil and natural gas.

Controlling energy costs for residents and businesses furthers a statewide interest in a strong economy and reducing the total cost of housing in Colorado.

More recent energy codes are more effective at ensuring building durability and structural integrity and protecting public health and safety through better:

Moisture management to prevent mold, mildew, and rot;

Airflow management; and

Protection during severe weather.

More recent energy codes incorporate newer building technologies, techniques, and materials and offer more options for builders.

Businesses and residents in low-income communities and rural areas of the state deserve at least the same durability, health and safety, and energy cost savings from energy efficient buildings as those in wealthier, urban, and suburban areas of the state.

Highly energy efficient homes and buildings can reduce energy use and help consumers save money on energy bills.

Highly energy efficient and low-carbon new homes and buildings are critical for meeting the greenhouse gas pollution reduction targets established in section 25-7-102 (2)(g).

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Building code" means regulations related to energy performance, electrical systems, mechanical systems, plumbing systems, or other elements of residential or commercial buildings.

"Energy code" means a subset of building codes related to the total energy performance and carbon emissions of residential and commercial buildings.

"International energy conservation code" means the energy code published by the international code council or a successor organization.

"Office" means the Colorado energy office created in section 24-38.5-101, C.R.S.

Every board of county commissioners that has adopted and enforced one or more building codes, or that adopts and enforces one or more building codes after July 1, 2022, shall adopt and enforce an energy code that applies to the construction of, and major renovations and additions to, all commercial and residential buildings as required by the energy code in the county to which the building code applies.

(3.5) (a) A board of county commissioners that has adopted and enforced one or more building codes, and that updates one or more building codes on or after July 1, 2023, and before July 1, 2026, shall adopt and enforce an energy code that achieves equivalent or better energy performance than the 2021 international energy conservation code and the model electric ready and solar ready code language developed for adoption by the energy code board pursuant to section 24-38.5-401 (5) at the same time other building codes are updated.

A board of county commissioners that has adopted and enforced one or more building codes, and that updates one or more building codes on or after July 1, 2026, shall adopt and begin enforcing an energy code that achieves equivalent or better energy and carbon emissions performance than the model low energy and carbon code developed for adoption by the energy code board pursuant to section 24-38.5-401 (6) at the same time other building codes are updated.

Notwithstanding subsections (3.5)(a) and (3.5)(b) of this section, a board of county commissioners representing a rural county is required to adopt and enforce an energy code that achieves equivalent or better energy performance than one of the last three most recent editions of the international energy conservation code rather than either an energy code that achieves equivalent or better energy performance than the 2021 international energy conservation code and the model electric ready and solar ready code language identified for adoption by the energy code board pursuant to section 24-38.5-401 (5) or an energy code that achieves equivalent or better energy and carbon emissions performance than the model low energy and carbon code identified for adoption by the energy code board pursuant to section 24-38.5-401 (6) if, while the grant program established pursuant to section 24-38.5-403 is accepting applications, the board of county commissioners applies for and is not awarded a grant that significantly assists in energy code adoption and enforcement training.

As used in this subsection (3.5)(c), a rural county means a county with a population of less than thirty thousand people, as determined pursuant to the most recently published population estimates from the state demographer appointed by the executive director of the department of local affairs.

When adopting or updating a building code prior to July 1, 2023, a board of county commissioners shall adopt and enforce an energy code that achieves equivalent or better energy performance than one of the three most recent editions of the international energy conservation code.

Repealed.

The following buildings are exempt from subsections (3) and (3.5) of this section:

Any building that is otherwise exempt from the provisions of the building code adopted by the board of county commissioners of the county in which the building is located and buildings that do not contain a conditioned space;

Any building that does not use either electricity or fossil fuels for comfort heating. A building will be presumed to be heated by electricity even in the absence of equipment used for electric comfort heating if the building is provided with electrical service in excess of one hundred amps, unless the code enforcement official of the county determines that the electrical service is necessary for a purpose other than for providing electric comfort heating.

Historic buildings that are listed on the national register of historic places or Colorado state register of historic properties and buildings that have been designated as historically significant or that have been deemed eligible for designation by a local governing body that is authorized to make such designations; and

Any building that is exempt pursuant to the energy code.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the board of county commissioners of a county that is required to adopt or update an energy code may make any amendments to the energy code that the board deems appropriate for local conditions, so long as the amendments do not decrease the effectiveness or energy efficiency of the energy code.

The office shall ensure that information explaining the requirements of the energy code and describing acceptable methods of compliance is available to builders, designers, engineers, and architects.

The office shall provide boards of county commissioners with technical assistance concerning the implementation and enforcement of the energy code.

Nothing in this section restricts the ability of an investor-owned utility with approval from the public utilities commission to:

Provide incentives or other energy efficiency program services to help the board of county commissioners of any county or builders comply with the requirements of this section; or

Earn shareholder incentives and claim credits towards its regulatory requirements for energy or greenhouse gas emission savings achieved as a result of incentives provided by the utility to help the board of county commissioners of any county or builders comply with the requirements of this section.

A utility not subject to regulation by the public utilities commission may provide incentives or other energy efficiency program services as they so choose to assist the board of county commissioners of any county or any builders in complying with the requirements of this section.

A utility may count mass-based emissions reductions associated with the requirements of this section towards compliance with its requirements under section 25-7-105 (1)(e)(X.7) or (1)(e)(X.8), section 40-3.2-108 (3)(b), or any similar greenhouse gas emissions reduction program or set of requirements.

A utility subject to regulation by the public utilities commission shall not count energy savings or greenhouse gas emissions reductions achieved through the requirements of this section for the purpose of calculating a shareholder incentive established pursuant to sections 40-3.2-103 (2)(d) and 40-3.2-104 (5) if the utility has not provided a financial investment for code adoption as documented in a plan approved by the commission.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 695, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2)(b) and (2)(c) amended, p. 72, § 10, effective March 18.

L. 2012:

(2)(b) and (2)(c) amended, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 974, § 36, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(e), (2)(b), (3), IP(5), and (6) amended and (1)(f), (1)(g), and (1)(h) added, (HB 19-1260), ch. 357, p. 3284, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(1)(i), (1)(j), (2)(b.5), (3.5), (8), (9), and (10) added, (2)(b), (3), and IP(5) amended, and (4) repealed, (HB 22-1362), ch. 301, p. 2183, § 7, effective June 2.